California statutes. Family Code
If, after the inquiry, the court is unable to identify the biological father or any possible biological father and no person has appeared claiming to be the biological father and claiming custodial rights, the court shall enter an order terminating the unknown biological father’s parental rights with reference to the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 510, Sec. 20.   (AB 1403)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7666.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), notice of the proceeding shall be given to every person identified as the biological father or a possible biological father in accordance with the Code of Civil Procedure for the service of process in a civil action in this state at least 10 days before the date of the proceeding, except that publication or posting of the notice of the proceeding is not required, and service on the parent or guardian of a biological father or possible biological father who is a minor is not required unless the minor has previously provided written authorization to serve the minor’s parent or guardian. Proof of giving the notice shall be filed with the court before the petition is heard.

(b) Notice to a man identified as or alleged to be the biological father is not required, and the court shall issue an order dispensing with that notice under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The relationship to the child has been previously terminated or determined not to exist by a court.

(2) The alleged father has executed a written form to waive notice, deny parentage, relinquish the child for adoption, or consent to the adoption of the child.

(3) The whereabouts or identity of the alleged father are unknown or cannot be ascertained.

(4) The alleged father has been served with written notice
 of alleged parentage and the proposed adoption, and has failed to bring an action pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7630 within 30 days of service of the notice or the birth of the child, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 98.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7667.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, an action to terminate the parental rights of an alleged father of a child as specified in this part shall be set for hearing not more than 45 days after filing of the petition, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(b) The matter so set shall have precedence over all other civil matters on the date set for trial, except an action to terminate parental rights pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 7800).

(c) The court may dispense with a hearing and issue an ex parte order terminating parental rights if any of the following applies:

(1) The identity or whereabouts of the alleged father are unknown.

(2) The alleged father has validly executed a waiver of the right to notice or a denial of parentage.

(3) The alleged father has been served with written notice of alleged parentage and the proposed adoption, and has failed to bring an action pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7630 within 30 days of service of the notice or the birth of the child, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 99.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7668.

(a) The court may continue the proceedings for not more than 30 days as necessary to appoint counsel and to enable counsel to prepare for the case adequately or for other good cause.

(b) In order to obtain an order for a continuance of the hearing, written notice shall be filed within two court days of the date set for the hearing, together with affidavits or declarations detailing specific facts showing that a continuance is necessary, unless the court for good cause entertains an oral motion for continuance.

(c) Continuances shall be granted only upon a showing of good cause. Neither a stipulation between counsel nor the convenience of the parties is in and of itself a good cause.

(d) A continuance shall be granted only for that period of time shown to be necessary by the evidence considered at the hearing on the motion. If a continuance is granted, the facts proven which require
 the continuance shall be entered upon the minutes of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7669.

(a) An order requiring or dispensing with an alleged father’s consent for the adoption of a child may be appealed from in the same manner as an order of the juvenile court declaring a person to be a ward of the juvenile court and is conclusive and binding upon the alleged father.

(b) After making the order, the court has no power to set aside, change, or modify that order.

(c) Nothing in this section limits the right to appeal from the order and judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 510, Sec. 23.   (AB 1403)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7670.

There shall be no filing fee charged for a petition filed pursuant to Section 7662.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7671.

A single petition may be filed pursuant to Section 7662 to terminate the parental rights of the alleged father or fathers of two or more biological siblings or to terminate the parental rights of two or more alleged fathers of the same child. A petition filed in accordance with this section may be granted in whole or in part in accordance with the procedures set forth in this chapter. The court shall retain discretion to bifurcate any case in which the petition was filed in accordance with this section, and shall do so whenever it is necessary to protect the interests of a party or a child who is the subject of the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 763, Sec. 4.   (AB 1701)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Protective and Restraining Orders [7700. - 7730.]



  ARTICLE 1. Orders in Summons [7700. - 7700.]

7700.

In addition to the contents required by Section 412.20 of the Code of Civil Procedure, in a proceeding under this part the summons shall contain a temporary restraining order restraining all parties, without the prior written consent of the other party or an order of the court, from removing from the state any minor child for whom the proceeding seeks to establish a parent and child relationship.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 179.6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Ex Parte Orders [7710. - 7710.]

7710.

During the pendency of a proceeding under this part, on application of a party in the manner provided by Part 4 (commencing with Section 240) of Division 2, the court may issue ex parte a protective order as defined in Section 6218 and any other order as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 6320) of Chapter 2 of Part 4 of Division 10.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 179.6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Orders After Notice and Hearing [7720. - 7720.]

7720.

(a) After notice and a hearing, the court may issue a protective order as defined in Section 6218 and any other restraining order as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 6340) of Chapter 2 of Part 4 of Division 10.

(b) The court may not issue a mutual protective order pursuant to subdivision (a) unless it meets the requirements of Section 6305.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 246, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Orders Included in Judgment [7730. - 7730.]

7730.

A judgment entered in a proceeding under this part may include a protective order as defined in Section 6218 and any other restraining order as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 6360) of Chapter 2 of Part 4 of Division 10.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 179.6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. FREEDOM FROM PARENTAL CUSTODY AND CONTROL [7800. - 7895.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [7800. - 7808.]

7800.

The purpose of this part is to serve the welfare and best interest of a child by providing the stability and security of an adoptive home when those conditions are otherwise missing from the child’s life.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7801.

This part shall be liberally construed to serve and protect the interests and welfare of the child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7802.

A proceeding may be brought under this part for the purpose of having a minor child declared free from the custody and control of either or both parents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7803.

A declaration of freedom from parental custody and control pursuant to this part terminates all parental rights and responsibilities with regard to the child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7804.

In a proceeding under this part, the court may appoint a suitable party to act in behalf of the child and may order such further notice of the proceedings to be given as the court deems proper.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7805.

(a) A petition filed in a proceeding under this part, or a report of the probation officer or county department designated by the board of supervisors to administer the public social services program filed in a proceeding under this part, may be inspected only by the following persons:

(1) Court personnel.

(2) The child who is the subject of the proceeding.

(3) The parents or guardian of the child.

(4) The attorneys for the parties.

(5) Any other person designated by the judge.

(b) In a proceeding before the court of appeal or Supreme Court to review a judgment or order entered in a proceeding under this part, the court record and briefs filed by the parties may be inspected only by the following persons:

(1) Court personnel.

(2) A party to
 the proceeding.

(3) The attorneys for the parties.

(4) Any other person designated by the presiding judge of the court before which the matter is pending.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if it is believed that the welfare of the child will be promoted thereby, the court and the probation officer may furnish information, pertaining to a petition under this part, to any of the following:

(1) The State Department of Social Services.

(2) A county welfare department.

(3) A public welfare agency.

(4) A private welfare agency licensed by the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7806.

There shall be no filing fee charged for a proceeding brought under this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7807.

(a) Sections 3020, 3022, 3040 to 3043, inclusive, and 3409 do not apply in a proceeding under this part.

(b) Except as provided in this subdivision and subdivision (c), all proceedings affecting a child, including proceedings under Divisions 8 (commencing with Section 3000) to 11 (commencing with Section 6500), inclusive, Part 1 (commencing with Section 7500) to Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600), inclusive, of this division, and Part 1 (commencing with Section 1400), Part 2 (commencing with Section 1500), and Part 4 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 4 of the Probate Code, and any motion or petition for custody or visitation filed in a
 proceeding under this part, shall be stayed. The petition to free the minor from parental custody and control under this section is the only matter that may be heard during the stay until the court issues a final ruling on the petition.

(c) This section does not limit the jurisdiction of the court pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 6240) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 10 with respect to domestic violence orders, or pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 300) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code with respect to dependency proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 763, Sec. 5.   (AB 1701)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7808.

This part does not apply to a minor adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 360 of the Welfare and Institutions Code on and after January 1, 1989, during the period in which the minor is a dependent child of the court. For those minors, the exclusive means for the termination of parental rights are provided in the following statutes:

(a) Section 366.26 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) Sections 8604 to 8606, inclusive, and 8700 of this code.

(c) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 7660) of Part 3 of this division of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 55.4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Circumstances Where Proceeding May Be Brought [7820. - 7827.]

7820.

A proceeding may be brought under this part for the purpose of having a child under the age of 18 years declared free from the custody and control of either or both parents if the child comes within any of the descriptions set out in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7821.

A finding pursuant to this chapter shall be supported by clear and convincing evidence, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 838, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7822.

(a) A proceeding under this part may be brought if any of the following occur:

(1) The child has been left without provision for the child’s identification by the child’s parent or parents.

(2) The child has been left by both parents or the sole parent in the care and custody of another person for a period of six months without any provision for the child’s support, or without communication from the parent or parents, with the intent on the part of the parent or parents to abandon the child.

(3) One parent has left the
 child in the care and custody of the other parent for a period of one year without any provision for the child’s support, or without communication from the parent, with the intent on the part of the parent to abandon the child.

(b) The failure to provide identification, failure to provide support, or failure to communicate is presumptive evidence of the intent to abandon. If the parent or parents have made only token efforts to support or communicate with the child, the court may declare the child abandoned by the parent or parents. In the event that a guardian has been appointed for the child, the court may still declare the child abandoned if the parent or parents have failed to communicate with or support the child within the meaning of this section.

(c) If the child has been left
 without provision for the child’s identification and the whereabouts of the parents are unknown, a petition may be filed after the 120th day following the discovery of the child and citation by publication may be commenced. The petition may not be heard until after the 180th day following the discovery of the child.

(d) If the parent has agreed for the child to be in the physical custody of another person or persons for adoption and has not signed an adoption placement agreement pursuant to Section 8801.3, a consent to adoption pursuant to Section 8814, or a relinquishment to a licensed adoption agency pursuant to Section 8700, evidence of the adoptive placement shall not in itself preclude the court from finding an intent on the part of that parent to abandon the child. If the parent has placed the child for adoption pursuant to
 Section 8801.3, consented to adoption pursuant to Section 8814, or relinquished the child to a licensed adoption agency pursuant to Section 8700, and has then either revoked the consent or rescinded the relinquishment, but has not taken reasonable action to obtain custody of the child, evidence of the adoptive placement shall not in itself preclude the court from finding an intent on the part of that parent to abandon the child.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), if the parent of an Indian child has transferred physical care, custody, and control of the child to an Indian custodian, that action shall not be deemed to constitute an abandonment of
 the child, unless the parent manifests the intent to abandon the child by either of the following:

(1) Failing to resume physical care, custody, and control of the child upon the request of the Indian custodian provided that, if the Indian custodian is unable to make a request because the parent has failed to keep the Indian custodian apprised of the parent’s whereabouts and the Indian custodian has made reasonable efforts to determine the whereabouts of the parent without success, there may be evidence of intent to abandon.

(2) Failing to substantially comply with any obligations assumed by the parent in the agreement with the Indian custodian despite the Indian custodian’s objection to the noncompliance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 100.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7823.

(a) A proceeding under this part may be brought if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The child has been neglected or cruelly treated by either or both parents. A finding that a parent committed severe sexual abuse, as described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 361.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, against the child shall be prima facie evidence that the parent has neglected or cruelly treated the child within the meaning of this subdivision.

(2) The child has been a dependent child of the juvenile court under any subdivision of Section 300 of the Welfare
 and Institutions Code and the parent or parents have been deprived of the child’s custody for one year before the filing of a petition pursuant to this part.

(b) Physical custody by the parent or parents for insubstantial periods of time does not interrupt the running of the one-year period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   (AB 2792)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7824.

(a) “Disability” as used in this section means any physical or mental incapacity which renders the parent or parents unable to care for and control the child adequately.

(b) A proceeding under this part may be brought where all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The child is one whose parent or parents (A) suffer a disability because of the habitual use of alcohol, or any of the controlled substances specified in Schedules I to V, inclusive, of Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, except when these controlled substances are used as part of a medically prescribed plan, or (B) are morally depraved.

(2) The child has been a dependent child of the juvenile court, and the parent or parents have been deprived of the child’s custody continuously for one year immediately before the filing of a petition pursuant to this part.

(c) Physical custody by the parent or parents for insubstantial periods of time does not interrupt the running of the one-year period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7825.

(a) A proceeding under this part may be brought where both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The child is one whose parent or parents are convicted of a felony.

(2) The facts of the crime of which the parent or parents were convicted are of such a nature so as to prove the unfitness of the parent or parents to have the future custody and control of the child. In making a determination pursuant to this section, the court may consider the parent’s criminal record prior to the felony conviction to the extent that the criminal record demonstrates a pattern of behavior
 substantially related to the welfare of the child or the parent’s ability to exercise custody and control regarding
 the child.

(b) The mother of a child may bring a proceeding under this part against the father of the child, where the child was conceived as a result of an act in violation of Section 261 of the Penal Code, and where the father was convicted of that violation. For purposes of this subdivision, there is a conclusive presumption that the father is unfit to have custody or control of the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 101.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7826.

A proceeding under this part may be brought where both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The child is one whose parent or parents have been declared by a court of competent jurisdiction, wherever situated, to be developmentally disabled or mentally ill.

(b) In the state or country in which the parent or parents reside or are hospitalized, the Director of State Hospitals or the Director of Developmental Services, or their equivalent, if any, and the executive director of the hospital, if any, of which the parent or parents are inmates or patients, certify that the parent or parents so declared to be developmentally disabled or
 mentally ill will not be capable of supporting or controlling the child in a proper manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 6.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7827.

(a) “Mentally disabled” as used in this section means that a parent or parents suffer a mental incapacity or disorder that renders the parent or parents unable to care for and control the child adequately.

(b) A proceeding under this part may be brought if the child is one whose parent or parents are mentally disabled and are likely to remain so in the foreseeable future.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the evidence of any two experts, each of whom shall be a physician and surgeon, certified either by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology or under Section 6750 of the
 Welfare and Institutions Code, a licensed psychologist who has a doctoral degree in psychology and at least five years of postgraduate experience in the diagnosis and treatment of emotional and mental disorders, is required to support a finding under this section. In addition to this requirement, the court shall have the discretion to call a licensed marriage and family therapist, a licensed professional clinical counselor, or a licensed clinical social worker, either of whom shall have at least five years of relevant postlicensure experience, in circumstances in which the court determines that this testimony is in the best interest of the child and is warranted by the circumstances of the particular family or parenting issues involved. However, the court may not call a licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed professional clinical counselor, or licensed clinical social worker
 pursuant to this section who is the adoption service provider, as defined in Section 8502, of the child who is the subject of the petition to terminate parental rights.

(d) If the parent or parents reside in another state or in a foreign country, the evidence required by this section may be supplied by the affidavits of two experts, each of whom shall be either of the following:

(1) A physician and surgeon who is a resident of that state or foreign country, and who has been certified by a medical organization or society of that state or foreign country to practice psychiatric or neurological medicine.

(2) A licensed psychologist who has a doctoral degree in psychology and at least five years of postgraduate
 experience in the diagnosis and treatment of emotional and mental disorders and who is licensed in that state or authorized to practice in that country.

(e) If the rights of a parent are sought to be terminated pursuant to this section, and the parent does not have an attorney, the court shall appoint an attorney for the parent pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 7860) of Chapter 3, whether or not a request for the appointment is made by the parent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 389, Sec. 13.   (AB 2296)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Procedure [7840. - 7895.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authorized Petitioners [7840. - 7842.]

7840.

(a) A petition may be filed under this part for an order or judgment declaring a child free from the custody and control of either or both parents by any of the following:

(1) The State Department of Social Services, a county welfare department, a licensed private or public adoption agency, a county adoption department, or a county probation department which is planning adoptive placement of the child with a licensed adoption agency.

(2) The State Department of Social Services acting as an adoption agency in counties which are not served by a county adoption agency.

(b) The fact that a child is in a foster care home subject to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code does not prevent the filing of a petition under subdivision (a).

(c) The county counsel or, if there is no county counsel,
 the district attorney of the county specified in Section 7845 shall, in a proper case, institute the proceeding upon the request of any of the state or county agencies mentioned in subdivision (a). The proceeding shall be instituted pursuant to this part within 30 days of the request.

(d) If, at the time of the filing of a petition by a department or agency specified in subdivision (a), the child is in the custody of the petitioner, the petitioner may continue to have custody of the child pending the hearing on the petition unless the court, in its discretion, makes such other order regarding custody pending the hearing as it finds will best serve and protect the interest and welfare of the child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7841.

(a) An interested person may file a petition under this part for an order or judgment declaring a child free from the custody and control of either or both parents.

(b) For purposes of this section, an “interested person” is one who has a direct interest in the action, and includes, but is not limited to, a person who has filed, or who intends to file within a period of 6 months, an adoption petition under Section 8714, 8802, or 9000, or a licensed adoption agency to whom the child has been relinquished by the other parent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 47, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7842.

A single petition may be filed under this part to free a child, or more than one child if the children are biological siblings, from the custody and control of both parents. A petition filed in accordance with this section may be granted in whole or in part in accordance with the procedures set forth in this chapter. The court shall retain discretion to bifurcate any case in which the petition was filed in accordance with this section, and shall do so whenever it is necessary to protect the interests of a party or a child who is the subject of the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 763, Sec. 6.   (AB 1701)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Venue [7845. - 7845.]

7845.

The petition shall be filed in any of the following:

(a) The county in which a minor described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7820) resides or is found.

(b) The county in which any of the acts which are set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7820) are alleged to have occurred.

(c) The county in which a petition for the adoption of the child has been filed or the adoption agency to which the child has been relinquished or proposed to be relinquished has an office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 492, Sec. 2.   (AB 941)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Investigation and Report [7850. - 7852.]

7850.

Upon the filing of a petition under Section 7841, the clerk of the court shall, in accordance with the direction of the court, immediately notify the juvenile probation officer, qualified court investigator, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed professional clinical counselor, or the county department designated by the board of supervisors to administer the public social services program, who shall immediately investigate the circumstances of the child and the circumstances which are alleged to bring the child within any
 provision of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7820).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 389, Sec. 14.   (AB 2296)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7851.

(a) The juvenile probation officer, qualified court investigator, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed professional clinical counselor, or the county department shall render to the court a written report of the investigation with a recommendation of the proper disposition to be made in the proceeding in the best interest of the child.

(b) The report shall include all of the following:

(1) A statement that the person making the report explained to the child the nature of the proceeding to end parental custody and control.

(2) A
 statement of the child’s feelings and thoughts concerning the pending proceeding.

(3) A statement of the child’s attitude towards the child’s parent or parents and particularly whether or not the child would prefer living with the parent or parents.

(4) A statement that the child was informed of the child’s right to attend the hearing on the petition and the child’s feelings concerning attending the hearing.

(c) If the age, or the physical, emotional, or other condition of the child precludes the child’s meaningful response to the explanations, inquiries, and information required by subdivision (b), a description of the condition shall satisfy the requirement of that subdivision.

(d) The court shall receive the report in evidence and shall read and consider its contents in rendering the court’s judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 102.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7851.5.

The petitioner shall be liable for all reasonable costs incurred in connection with the termination of parental rights, including, but not limited to, costs incurred for the investigation required by this article. However, public agencies and nonprofit organizations are exempt from payment of the costs of the investigation. The liability of a petitioner for costs under this section shall not exceed nine hundred dollars ($900). The court may defer, waive, or reduce the costs when the payment would cause an economic hardship which would be detrimental to the welfare of the child.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.

“Qualified court investigator,” as used in this article, has the meaning provided by Section 8543.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 182.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Appointment of Counsel [7860. - 7864.]

7860.

At the beginning of the proceeding on a petition filed pursuant to this part, counsel shall be appointed as provided in this article. The public defender or private counsel may be appointed as counsel pursuant to this article. The same counsel shall not be appointed to represent both the child and the child’s parent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7861.

The court shall consider whether the interests of the child require the appointment of counsel. If the court finds that the interests of the child require representation by counsel, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the child, whether or not the child is able to afford counsel. The child shall not be present in court unless the child so requests or the court so orders.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7862.

If a parent appears without counsel and is unable to afford counsel, the court shall appoint counsel for the parent, unless that representation is knowingly and intelligently waived.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7863.

Private counsel appointed under this article shall receive a reasonable sum for compensation and expenses, the amount of which shall be determined by the court. The amount so determined shall be paid by the real parties in interest, other than the child, in proportions the court deems just. However, if the court finds that any of the real parties in interest are unable to afford counsel, the amount shall be paid out of the general fund of the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7864.

The court may continue the proceeding for not to exceed 30 days as necessary to appoint counsel and to enable counsel to become acquainted with the case.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Time for Hearing; Continuance [7870. - 7871.]

7870.

(a) It is the public policy of this state that judicial proceedings to declare a child free from parental custody and control shall be fully determined as expeditiously as possible.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a proceeding to declare a child free from parental custody and control pursuant to this part shall be set for hearing not more than 45 days after the filing of the petition. If, at the time set for hearing, or at any continuance thereof, service has been completed and no interested person appears to contest, the court may issue an order based on the verified pleadings and any other evidence as may be submitted. If any interested person appears to contest the
 matter, the court shall set the matter for trial. The matter so set has precedence over all other civil matters on the date set for trial.

(c) The court may continue the proceeding as provided in Section 7864 or Section 7871.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 638, Sec. 4.   (AB 1757)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7871.

(a) A continuance may be granted only upon a showing of good cause. Neither a stipulation between counsel nor the convenience of the parties is in and of itself a good cause.

(b) Unless the court for good cause entertains an oral motion for continuance, written notice of a motion for a continuance of the hearing shall be filed within two court days of the date set for the hearing, together with affidavits or declarations detailing specific facts showing that a continuance is necessary.

(c) A continuance shall be granted only for that period of time shown to be necessary by the evidence considered at the hearing on the motion. Whenever a continuance is granted, the facts proven which require the continuance shall be entered upon the minutes of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Notice of Proceeding and Attendance at Hearing [7880. - 7884.]

7880.

(a) Upon the filing of the petition, a citation shall issue requiring any person having the custody or control of the child, or the person with whom the child is, to appear at a time and place stated in the citation.

(b) The citation shall also require the person to appear with the child except that, if the child is under the age of 10 years, appearance with the child is required only upon order of the court after necessity has been shown.

(c) Service of the citation shall be made in the manner prescribed by law for service of civil process at least 10 days before the time stated in the citation for the appearance. The
 party or attorney responsible for serving the citation shall do so in a timely manner in order to maximize the response time available to the party being served.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 638, Sec. 5.   (AB 1757)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7881.

(a) Notice of the proceeding shall be given by service of a citation on the father or mother of the child, if the place of residence of the father or mother is known to the petitioner. If the place of residence of the father or mother is not known to the petitioner, then the citation shall be served on the grandparents and adult brothers, sisters, uncles, aunts, and first cousins of the child, if there are any and if their residences and relationships to the child are known to the petitioner.

(b) The citation shall advise the person or persons that they may appear at the time and place stated in the citation. The citation shall also advise the person or persons of the rights and procedures set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 7860). If the petition is filed for the purpose of freeing the child for placement for adoption, the citation shall so state.

(c) The citation shall be served in the manner
 provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action, other than by publication. If one parent has relinquished the child for the purpose of adoption, or has signed a consent for adoption as provided in Sections 8700, 8814, or 9003, notice as provided in this section need not be given to the parent who has signed the relinquishment or consent.

(d) Service of the citations required by this section shall be made at least 10 days before the time stated in the citation for the appearance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7882.

(a) If the parent of the child or a person alleged to be or claiming to be the parent cannot, with reasonable diligence, be served as provided for in Section 7881, or if the parent’s place of residence is not known to the petitioner, the petitioner or the petitioner’s agent or attorney shall make and file an affidavit stating the name of the parent or alleged parent and their place of residence, if known to the petitioner, and the name of the parent or alleged parent whose place of residence is unknown to the petitioner.

(b) Upon the filing of the affidavit, the court shall make an order that (1) the service shall be made by the publication of a